South Dakota, session 2026, HB1175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 23-3-15.1 be AMENDED:
23-3-15.1. The Division of Criminal Investigation may, upon the request of any
Indian tribe, obtain national criminal history record information on any individual seeking
to be or currently serving:
(1) As a member of the tribal council or a district council;
(2) As judge of the tribal court;
(3) On a tribal board or commission;
(4) As a tribal conservation officer;
(5) As an executive officer of a tribal commercial enterprise;
(6) As a faculty member or administrator of any tribal educational institution or
program;
(7) With tribal child protection and youth program responsibilities, to the extent that
the criminal history record information is not available through the Bureau of Indian
Affairs by means of the Indian Child Protection and Family Violence Act;
(8) In a position working with tribal juvenile delinquents and offenders;
(9) As a tribal gaming licensee for whom criminal history background screening is not
available through the National Indian Gaming Commission; and
(10) As a tribal foster parent or prospective adoptive parent.
Section 2. That § 23-3-15.2 be AMENDED:
23-3-15.2. In order to determine the suitability of any applicant for or holder of a
position listed in § 23-3-15.1, the requesting Indian tribe shall submit the completed
fingerprint cards of the applicant or position holder to the Division of Criminal Investigation

26.830.16 2 1175
for a national criminal history record check. The tribe, or, if required by the tribe, the
applicant or position holder, must pay all processing fees required either by the Division
of Criminal Investigation or the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
HB1175 ENROLLED

26.830.16 3 1175
An Act to revise provisions related to Division of Criminal Investigation cooperation with Indian
tribes.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1175
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1175 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1175 ENROLLED